Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF3431.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 3.855, subdivision 2, is amended to read: Subd. 2. new text begin Unrepresentednew text end state employee compensation. (a) The commissioner of management and budget shall submit to the chair of the commission any compensation plans or salaries prepared under section 43A.18, subdivisions 2, 3, 3b, and 4. The chancellor of the Minnesota State Colleges and Universities shall submit any compensation plan under section 43A.18, subdivision 3a.new text begin If the commission disapproves a compensation plan or salary, the commission must specify in writing to the parties the portions of the compensation plan or salaries with which the commission disagrees and the commission's reasons for disapproval. If the commission approves a compensation plan or salary, the commission must submit the compensation plan or salaries to the legislature to be accepted or rejected under this section.new text end new text begin (b) When the legislature is not in session, the commission may give interim approval to a salary or compensation plan. The commission must submit the approved salaries and compensation plans to the entire legislature for ratification at a special legislative session called to consider the salary and compensation plans or at the next regular legislative session. The commission's approval or disapproval is not binding on the legislature. new text end deleted text begin (b)deleted text end new text begin (c) When the legislature is not in session, new text end the proposed salary or compensation plan must be implemented upon deleted text begin its submission todeleted text end new text begin approval bynew text end the commissionnew text begin , and state employees covered by the proposed plan or salary do not have the right to strike while the interim approval is in effectnew text end . Sec. 2. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 3.855, subdivision 3, is amended to read: Subd. 3. Other deleted text begin salary and compensation plandeleted text end new text begin salaries and compensation plansnew text end . The commission shallnew text begin :new text end new text begin (1) review and approve or reject a plan for compensation and the terms and conditions of employment prepared and submitted by the commissioner of management and budget under section 43A.18, subdivision 2, covering all state employees who are not represented by an exclusive bargaining representative and whose compensation is not provided for by chapter 43A or other law; new text end new text begin (2) review and approve or reject a plan for total compensation and the terms and conditions of employment for employees in positions identified as managerial under section 43A.18, subdivision 3, whose salaries and benefits are not otherwise provided for in law or other plans established under chapter 43A; new text end new text begin (3) review and approve or reject recommendations for salary range of officials of higher education systems under section 15A.081, subdivision 7c; new text end new text begin (4) review and approve or reject plans for compensation, terms, and conditions of employment proposed under section 43A.18, subdivisions 3a, 3b, and 4; and new text end new text begin (5)new text end review and approve or reject the plan for compensation, terms, and conditions of employment of classified employees in the office of the legislative auditor under section 3.971, subdivision 2. Sec. 3. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 3.855, subdivision 6, is amended to read: Subd. 6. Information required; collective bargaining agreements, memoranda of understanding, and interest arbitration awards. Within 14 days after the implementation of a collective bargaining agreement, memorandum of understanding, deleted text begin compensation plan,deleted text end or receipt of an interest arbitration award, the commissioner of management and budget must submit to the Legislative Coordinating Commission the following: (1) a copy of the collective bargaining agreement deleted text begin or compensation plandeleted text end showing changes from previous agreements and a copy of the executed agreement; (2) a copy of any memorandum of understanding that has a fiscal impact or interest arbitration award; (3) a comparison of biennial compensation costs under the current agreement deleted text begin or plandeleted text end to the projected biennial compensation costs under the new agreement, memorandum of understanding, or interest arbitration award; and (4) a comparison of biennial compensation costs under the current agreement deleted text begin or plandeleted text end to the projected biennial compensation costs for the following biennium under the new agreement, memorandum of understanding, or interest arbitration award. Sec. 4. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 43A.05, subdivision 3, is amended to read: Subd. 3. Commissioner's plan. The commissioner shall periodically develop and establish pursuant to this chapter a commissioner's plan. The commissioner shall submit the plannew text begin before the plan becomes effectivenew text end to the Legislative Coordinating Commissionnew text begin for approvalnew text end . Sec. 5. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 43A.18, subdivision 2, is amended to read: Subd. 2. Commissioner's plan. Except as provided in section 43A.01, the compensation, terms and conditions of employment for all classified and unclassified employees, except unclassified employees in the legislative and judicial branches, who are not covered by a collective bargaining agreement and not otherwise provided for in chapter 43A or other law are governed solely by a plan developed by the commissioner. The Legislative Coordinating Commission shall reviewnew text begin and approve, reject, or modifynew text end the plan under section 3.855, subdivision 2. The plan need not be adopted in accordance with the rulemaking provisions of chapter 14. Sec. 6. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 43A.18, subdivision 3, is amended to read: Subd. 3. Managerial plan. (a) The commissioner shall identify individual positions or groups of positions in the classified and unclassified service in the executive branch as being managerial. The list must not include positions listed in subdivision 4. (b) The commissioner shall periodically prepare a plan for total compensation and terms and conditions of employment for employees of those positions identified as being managerial and whose salaries and benefits are not otherwise provided for in law or other plans established under this chapter. Before becoming effective those portions of the plan establishing compensation and terms and conditions of employment must be deleted text begin submitted todeleted text end new text begin reviewed and approved or modified bynew text end the Legislative Coordinating Commissionnew text begin and the legislaturenew text end under section 3.855, subdivisions 2 and 3. (c) Incumbents of managerial positions as identified under this subdivision must be excluded from any bargaining units under chapter 179A. (d) The management compensation plan must provide methods and levels of compensation for managers that will be generally comparable to those applicable to managers in other public and private employment. The plan must ensure that compensation within assigned salary ranges is related to level of performance. The plan must also provide a procedure for establishment of a salary rate for a newly created position and a new appointee to an existing position and for progression through assigned salary ranges. The employee benefits established under the provisions of the managerial plan may be extended to agency heads whose salaries are established in section 15A.0815 and to constitutional officers, judges of the Workers' Compensation Court of Appeals, and Tax Court judges. Sec. 7. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 43A.18, subdivision 9, is amended to read: Subd. 9. Summary information on website. Before the commissioner submits a proposed collective bargaining agreement, arbitration award, or compensation plan to the Legislative Coordinating Commission for review under section 3.855, the commissioner must post on a state website a summarynew text begin of the proposed agreement, award, or plan. The summary must include the amount of and nature of proposed changes in employee compensation, the estimated cost to the state of proposed changes in employee compensation, and a description of proposed significant changes in policy. After approval of an agreement, award, or plan by the Legislative Coordinating Commission, the commissioner must provide a link from the commissioner's summary to the full text of the agreement, award, or plan. The summary must remain on the website at least until the full legislature has approved the agreement, award, or plan. This section also applies to agreements, awards, and plansnew text end covering employees of the Minnesota State Colleges and Universities and to compensation plans that must be submitted to the Legislative Coordinating Commission by other executive appointing authorities. The Minnesota State Colleges and Universities and other executive appointing authorities must submit information to the commissioner, at a time and in a manner specified by the commissioner, so the commissioner can post information relating to these appointing authorities on the web as required by this section. Sec. 8. new text begin REVIVAL AND REENACTMENT.new text end new text begin Minnesota Statutes 2023 Supplement, section 3.855, subdivision 5, is revived and reenacted effective retroactively from May 24, 2024. Any time frames within or dependent on the subdivision are based on the original effective date in Laws 2019, First Special Session chapter 10, article 2, section 1. new text end